dev/verb/verb.ne.dix
  <!-- बच्; बच; 5 -->
    <pardef n="बच/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाउन</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाउँदा</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाइस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाऔं</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हतार; हतार; 1 -->
    <pardef n="हतार__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िंदै</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रिसाउ; रिसाउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="रिसाउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कर्; कर; 2 -->
    <pardef n="कर/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाएँ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ब्यूँझाउ; ब्यूँझाउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ब्यूँझाउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- माग; माग; 2 -->
    <pardef n="माग__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ें</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लर्काउ; लर्काउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लर्काउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मच्चाउ; मच्चाउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मच्चाउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लिदा; लिदा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लिदा__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बादी; बादी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बादी__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दिनसक्ने; दिनसक्ने; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दिनसक्ने__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सोधे; सोधे; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सोधे__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- घट्; घट; 3 -->
    <pardef n="घट/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दै</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नचाह; नचाह; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नचाह__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वास्; वास्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वास्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ना</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सिउ; सिउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सिउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- फर्कि; फर्कि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="फर्कि__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सोध्; सोध; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सोध/्__opt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ौं</l>
          <r>्<s n="opt"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सोध्; सोध; 11 -->
    <pardef n="सोध/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्यो</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िनस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नुहोस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pol"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नोस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pol"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नुस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pol"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ें</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छु</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ौं</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छौ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उभ्; उभ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उभ/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िए</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जान; जान; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जान__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ें</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सिक; सिक; 2 -->
    <pardef n="सिक__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ें</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="impers"/><s n="fam"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रूचाउ; रूचाउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="रूचाउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जन्माउ; जन्माउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जन्माउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- झिकाउ; झिकाउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="झिकाउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="बच्"><i>बच</i><par n="बच/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="हतार"><i>हतार</i><par n="हतार__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="रिसाउ"><i>रिसाउ</i><par n="रिसाउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="कर्"><i>कर</i><par n="कर/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ब्यूँझाउ"><i>ब्यूँझाउ</i><par n="ब्यूँझाउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="माग"><i>माग</i><par n="माग__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="लर्काउ"><i>लर्काउ</i><par n="लर्काउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="मच्चाउ"><i>मच्चाउ</i><par n="मच्चाउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="लिदा"><i>लिदा</i><par n="लिदा__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बादी"><i>बादी</i><par n="बादी__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="दिनसक्ने"><i>दिनसक्ने</i><par n="दिनसक्ने__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सोधे"><i>सोधे</i><par n="सोधे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="घट्"><i>घट</i><par n="घट/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="नचाह"><i>नचाह</i><par n="नचाह__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="वास्"><i>वास्</i><par n="वास्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सिउ"><i>सिउ</i><par n="सिउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="फर्कि"><i>फर्कि</i><par n="फर्कि__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सोध्"><i>सोध</i><par n="सोध/्__opt"/></e>
    <e lm="सोध्"><i>सोध</i><par n="सोध/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="उभ्"><i>उभ</i><par n="उभ/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="जान"><i>जान</i><par n="जान__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सिक"><i>सिक</i><par n="सिक__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="रूचाउ"><i>रूचाउ</i><par n="रूचाउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="जन्माउ"><i>जन्माउ</i><par n="जन्माउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="झिकाउ"><i>झिकाउ</i><par n="झिकाउ__vblex"/></e>
